Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-117
Department of Health and Human Services; information on programs and services.

On or before December 1, 2019, the Department of Health and Human Services shall make publicly available information on programs and services available for referral by the department to respond to the safety and needs of children reported or suspected to be victims of sex trafficking of a minor or labor trafficking of a minor as defined in section 28-830 and their families. The department shall develop this information in consultation with representatives of child advocacy centers, behavioral health providers, child welfare and juvenile justice service providers, law enforcement representatives, and prosecutors.

Laws 2019, LB519, § 12.